Utah statutes.
31A-29-122.   Immunity.

There is no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature may arise against any member of the board, the board's agents or employees, the executive director, the administrator or its agents or employees, or the commissioner for any action or omission by them in effecting the provisions of this chapter.

